Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7334.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 4-11 of the General Laws entitled "Psittacine Birds" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
4-11-14. Parrot sale restrictions.
(a) Definitions. As used in this section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings:
(1) “Agricultural use” means the husbandry of birds such as domestic poultry raised as
livestock for personal or commercial use. Parrots serve no agricultural purposes and are excluded
from agricultural use under the terms of this definition.
(2) “Animal care facility” means an animal control center, shelter or impoundment facility
maintained by or under contract with any state, county, or municipality, whose mission or practice
is to protect the welfare of animals and find placement for them in permanent homes or animal
rescue organizations.
(3) “Animal rescue organization” means a not-for-profit organization whose mission and
practice is the rescue and placement of mammals, birds, reptiles, amphibians, or fish into permanent
homes. Organizations that procure animals from breeders or brokers in exchange for payment or
compensation do not qualify as animal rescue organizations.
(4) “Breeder” means an individual or entity who breeds animals upon their residential or
commercial premises for sale to individuals, brokers, or pet stores either in person or online.
(5) “Broker” means a person or entity who transfers birds, mammals, amphibians, reptiles

or fish at wholesale for resale to another.
(6) “Parrots” means any of the numerous widely distributed tropical birds belonging to the
order psittaciformes.
(7) “Pet store” means a retail establishment where animals are sold, exchanged, bartered,
or offered for sale to the general public for profit or commercial purposes. "Pet store" shall not
include an animal care facility, animal rescue organization, or breeder as defined in this subsection.
(b) Prohibition of the sale of parrots at pet stores.
(1) It shall be unlawful for a pet store to sell or offer for sale a parrot procured from a
breeder or broker.
(2) A pet store may host adoption events wherein parrots are offered for permanent
placement into homes provided that:
(i) The parrots offered for placement are sourced from animal care facilities or animal
rescue organizations.
(ii) The name of the animal care facility or rescue organization is clearly displayed next to
the enclosures of the parrots for the duration of the adoption event.
(3) Pet stores shall have a one year grace period to sell parrots already in their possession
on the effective date of this section, but are prohibited from acquiring any additional parrots for
sale from breeders or brokers after the effective date of this section.
(c) Prohibition on sales in public places.
(1) It shall be unlawful for any person to offer for sale, sell, exchange, or barter any bird
on any roadside, park, other recreation area, outdoor market, or commercial or retail parking lot,
even if access is authorized by the property owner.
(2) This section shall not apply to the following:
(i) The display of birds as part of a state or county fair exhibition.
(ii) A bird sold or displayed for agricultural use.
(iii) The display of birds as part of a 4-H program or educational program; provided,
however, parrots are not to be sold or advertised for sale at these events.
(d) Requirements for sale to individuals.
(1) A person, pet dealer, breeder, or business that sells birds that are not classified as
agricultural to a purchaser located in Rhode Island either in person or online, shall provide a written
notice to the purchaser or recipient of the bird that states all of the following:
(i) The breeder, including the city and state where the breeder is located;
(ii) If applicable, the United States Department of Agriculture license number associated
with the breeder;
LC004282 - Page 2 of 4

(iii) If birds are obtained through a broker, it shall be clearly conveyed to the purchaser that
the seller is not the breeder. Broker information shall be included in the contract.
(2) A contract entered into or on after January 1, 2027, to transfer ownership of a bird to a
purchaser located in Rhode Island is considered void if the broker, pet dealer, breeder, or business
requires a nonrefundable deposit or does not provide to the purchaser the required information
listed in this subsection.
(i) If money is exchanged through a contract that is void pursuant to this subsection, the
seller will refund the money to the purchaser within thirty (30) days of receiving notice that the
contract is void.
(ii) A person, pet dealer, or business who offers a contract that contains a term that violates
this subsection may be sued in any court of competent jurisdiction for the recovery of money
exchanged pursuant to that contract and other remedies the court deems appropriate.
(e) Violation -- Penalties.
Any pet store, breeder, or broker who sells a bird in violation of this section shall be fined
one thousand dollars ($1,000). Each unlawful sale or offer for sale shall constitute a separate
violation. If a pet store acquires more birds during the one year grace period from a broker or
breeder, a fine of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) shall be assessed for each violation.
(f) Implementation.
An advisory committee consisting of representatives from Foster Parrots, Ltd. and Rhode
Island Parrot Rescue shall be available to assist pet stores as they work to comply with subsection
(b) of this section. Pet stores are not required to utilize the advisory committee, but it is encouraged.
At the end of the grace period, the advisory committee shall confirm that parrots are no longer
being sold at any pet stores. The committee shall remain in effect for eighteen (18) months after
the effective date of this section and shall issue an implementation status report at the end of its
term.
(g) Severability.
The invalidity of any subsection or provisions of this section shall not invalidate any other
subsection or provision and the application of those subsections or provisions shall not be affected
and shall remain in full force and effect.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004282
========
LC004282 - Page 3 of 4